Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.400

Director's authority—Violation and enforcement reporting.

The director is authorized to regularly report violations of chapter 528, Laws of 2009, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

[ 2009 c 528 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—License requirement—Implementation—2009 c 528: See notes following RCW 19.146.010.